Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 11 Fiscal Provisions

§ 25-11-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Actual cost” means the cost of providing treatment or services for a resident in a state institution including minimum costs, as set by the department having the direct authority and control of the institution, of maintaining the resident;

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

“Established charge” means that part of the actual cost for which the resident, the resident’s estate and legally responsible persons are liable. The established charge may equal but not exceed the actual cost;

“Legally responsible person” means the resident, a responsible relative or the conservator of the resident’s property as defined by W.S. 3-1-101(a)(iii);

“Resident” means a patient or resident voluntarily admitted or involuntarily committed to a state institution;

“Responsible relative” means a resident’s spouse or a resident’s parents if the resident is an unemancipated minor;

“State institution” means any institution in title 25 under the direct authority and control of the department of health.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, §§ 2, 3; 1993, ch. 85, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iv), substituted “W.S. 3-1-101(a)(iii)” for “W.S. 3-1-101(a)(ii).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Acts 2007, ch. 216, §
5 provides:

“(a) There is appropriated two million two hundred nine thousand nine hundred dollars ($2,209,900.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, mental health division, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. The funds appropriated under this subsection shall be used to enable community mental health centers to provide community-based housing and residential services for clients with serious and persistent mental illness. The residential services shall include appropriate support to enable the residents in the housing to develop or improve daily living skills, including self-care, meal preparation, shopping and budgeting proficiencies so the client may successfully remain in an independent living situation. The funds under this subsection shall only be expended as follows:

“(i) Not more than one hundred ninety-four thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($194,150.00) to a community mental health center that enters into a contract with the mental health division to establish ten (10) supervised apartments in Albany county;

“(ii) Not more than two million fifteen thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($2,015,750.00) to the mental health division to enter into contracts with community mental health centers that agree to establish a group home in each of the following regions of the state:

“(A) In the southeast region of Wyoming;

“(B) In the northeast region of Wyoming;

“(C) In the southwest region of Wyoming;

“(D) In the northwest region of Wyoming; and

“(E) In the central region of Wyoming.”

Acts 2007, ch. 216, §
7 provides:

“Mental health regional services enhancements.

“(a) There is appropriated one hundred forty-two thousand two hundred dollars ($142,200.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, mental health division, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. The appropriation under this subsection shall be one-time funding. The funds appropriated under this subsection shall only be used to purchase not more than eighteen (18) self-contained telepsychiatry equipment units each consisting of, at minimum, a monitor, a high definition camera, a microphone and necessary software. The self-contained telepsychiatry equipment units shall be distributed to community mental health centers that do not have such equipment to enable the centers to provide telepsychiatry in rural and frontier areas of the state. Each community mental health center receiving a self-contained telepsychiatry equipment unit under this subsection shall, no later than August 1, 2008, submit to the mental health division a report containing information with respect to the usage of the equipment including, but not limited to, the number of clients served with the equipment, the number of staff who provided services using the equipment, their professional duties with the center, and any other information the mental health division may require. The division shall compile the information received from the community mental health centers under this subsection and submit a report containing that information no later than September 1, 2008, to the joint appropriations interim committee, the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the select committee on mental health and substance abuse services, if the select committee is in existence on September 1, 2008.

“(b) There is appropriated nine hundred seventy-one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($971,250.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, mental health division, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. The funds appropriated under this subsection shall only be used to enable community mental health centers to contract with psychiatrists, including those who may be accessed through telepsychiatry services. Funds under this subsection shall be distributed within regions of the state designated by the mental health division, upon application showing that one (1) or more community mental health centers that are under contract with the mental health division within the designated region have contracted with a qualified psychiatrist to provide the services authorized under this section. Community mental health centers receiving funds under this subsection shall only expend the funds to contract with a psychiatrist under this subsection. Any funds unobligated and unexpended under this subsection on June 30, 2008, shall revert to the budget reserve account.

“(c) There is appropriated five hundred sixty thousand dollars ($560,000.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, mental health division, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. The funds appropriated under this subsection shall only be used to enhance the availability of nursing support services in conjunction with the psychiatrists under contract with community mental health centers in regions of the state as designated by the mental health division. Funds under this subsection shall be distributed within regions of the state designated by the mental health division, upon application showing that community mental health centers under contract with the state have contracted with qualified nursing staff to provide the support to psychiatrists under contract with the centers. Community mental health centers receiving funds under this subsection shall only expend the funds to contract with nurses under this subsection. Any funds unobligated and unexpended under this subsection on June 30, 2008, shall revert to the budget reserve account.

“(d) There is appropriated seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, mental health division, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. The funds appropriated under this subsection shall only be used to provide regional training of general or specialty practice physicians on the identification, diagnosis and pharmacological treatment of common mental health and substance abuse problems. The training sessions shall be conducted by a contractor selected by the mental health division through a competitive bid process.

“(e) There is appropriated four hundred thirty-two thousand eight hundred dollars ($432,800.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, mental health division, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. The funds appropriated under this subsection shall be distributed to community mental health centers under contract with the mental health division to enhance ancillary transportation support services for clients of the community mental health centers. The funds under this subsection shall be distributed to community mental health centers within regions of the state designated by the mental health division under the existing distribution formula within each region only upon a commitment by the community mental health centers within the region to develop a coordinated plan for transportation throughout the region.

“(f) There is appropriated three hundred fifty-six thousand two hundred forty dollars ($356,240.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of health, mental health division, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008. The funds appropriated under this subsection shall only be used to expand the availability of respite care statewide. The mental health division shall contract with community mental health centers for respite care for families and caregivers of clients unable to care for themselves to provide the respite care funded under this subsection. The funds under this subsection shall be distributed to community mental health centers within regions of the state designated by the mental health division under the existing distribution formula within each region only upon a commitment by the community mental health centers within the region to coordinate respite care throughout the region.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 25-11-102.
Department to adopt schedule of costs for services and treatments; residents' accounts.

The department of health shall promulgate on or before October 1 of each year a schedule of actual costs for services and treatment rendered residents at each state institution under the direct authority and control of the department.

In determining actual costs the department may subtract from operation costs capital outlay and real property repair and maintenance to determine the immediate benefit to the resident.

An account for each resident shall record the actual costs and established charge for each month or fraction thereof. The established charge shall be paid in the manner provided in this article and credited to the account of the resident.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 85, § 1.

§ 25-11-103.
Determining financial ability and established charges; special funds considered as part of resident's assets.

Established charges shall be determined using a sliding scale promulgated by the department of health or the department of family services for each state institution under its direct authority and control. The sliding scale shall be based upon the ability of the resident or other legally responsible person to pay and shall be designed to provide that the resident or legally responsible person shall not be deprived of income necessary to maintain a reasonable standard of living for that person and his dependents.

Upon completion of a resident questionnaire form provided by the department, the director of the department shall determine the established charge to be assessed in each case using the sliding scale promulgated by the department. Any payor may protest his established charge through the head of the institution to the department exercising direct authority and control over the institution if still dissatisfied. The department may affirm the established charge or set a different established charge. The decision of the department may be appealed pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Any available income and special funds, including but not limited to hospitalization insurance, social security benefits, disability compensation, pensions, retirement benefits and veterans’ benefits shall be considered part of the total assets of a resident in determining an established charge.

Nothing in this chapter limits any obligation created by law or contract for third parties to pay for services provided to a resident admitted to a state institution.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

made a grammatical change in (d).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See
§ 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 25-11-104.
Reimbursement of general fund for payments.

Payments for services provided to a resident admitted to a state institution either voluntarily or involuntarily shall be reimbursed to the state general fund.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 1.

§ 25-11-105.
Limitation on liability of responsible relatives; liability of relatives, patient and estate after release or death; exception.

The liability of a parent or spouse of a resident for payment of established charges shall not exceed two (2) years of cumulative care at the state institution. Voluntary payments for care in excess of the two (2) year limitation may be accepted. This section does not limit the obligation, created by contract or law, of third party payments for resident or temporary services.

Subject to the limitation in subsection (a) of this section, the resident, his estate and other legally responsible persons are liable after release of the resident for the payment of any unpaid established charge. If a resident or a released resident dies, his estate is liable for all unpaid established charges unless the department exercising direct authority and control over the institution determines that no claim or a lesser claim should be filed against the estate due to the need for support from the proceeds of the estate of the legal dependents of the resident who are the beneficiaries of his estate.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2.

§ 25-11-106.
Billings; assignment of insurance; collection or waiver of arrearages.

The department of health shall establish procedures requiring state institutions under its direct authority and control to provide monthly billings to each resident of the state institution and to each legally responsible person. Billings under this subsection for the state hospital shall provide for an itemization, including at a minimum, the daily established charge.

The department shall obtain an assignment of benefits from any resident under its care and supervision who has insurance that may cover services provided.

An account for established charges which is not paid within ninety (90) days after the end of the month in which the charges accrue is in arrears and shall be referred to the respective department for collection. The department may contract with a private person or agency for collection of accounts under this subsection.

The department may adjust, compromise or waive collection of charges from the legally responsible person if the department determines that the person is without financial means or that collection would constitute a hardship. If the department decides to waive collection of charges, no future billing will be sent to a resident or legally responsible person.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 85, § 1.

§ 25-11-107.
State to bear costs of those unable to pay.

If a resident or legally responsible person has no available assets at the time of or during the resident’s stay at a state institution to pay an established charge, all costs of treatment and transportation shall be borne by the state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 1.

§ 25-11-108.
Department to promulgate rules; forms.

The department of health shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations and shall approve and provide forms necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 85, § 1.